Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-529
Rural or suburban fire protection district; radio equipment; purchase; reimbursement.

The materiel administrator of the Department of Administrative Services is authorized to purchase radio equipment for any rural or suburban fire protection district when requested by the district. The district shall reimburse the state for the cost of any equipment so purchased for it.

Laws 1969, c. 280, § 1, p. 1048;

Laws 2000, LB 654, § 2.

Materiel administrator, see sections 81-147 to 81-151.